incubator/apertium-ru-cu/apertium-ru-cu.ru.dix
    <!-- [m.3*a(2)] ботин/ок__n -->
    <pardef n="ботин/ок__n">
      <e c="m.3*a">
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ка</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ке</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ком</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ках</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кам</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ками</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.3*b] васил/ёк__n -->
    <pardef n="васил/ёк__n">
      <e c="m.3*b">
        <p>
          <l>ёк</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ёк</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ька'</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьке'</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьку'</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ько'м</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьки'</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьки'</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ёк</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ька'х</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ька'м</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ька'ми</l>
          <r>ёк<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.4a] пейзаж__n -->
    <pardef n="пейзаж__n">
      <e c="m.4a">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ей</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.4b] багаж__n -->
    <pardef n="багаж__n">
      <e c="m.4b">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`м</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`й</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`х</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`м</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`ми</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ботинок"><i>боти'н</i><par n="ботин/ок__n"/></e>
    <e lm="валенок"><i>вале'нок</i><par n="ботин/ок__n"/></e>
    <e lm="василёк"><i>васил</i><par n="васил/ёк__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пейзаж"><i>пейза'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="репортаж"><i>репорта'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пасаж"><i>паса'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ажиотаж"><i>ажиота'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пилотаж"><i>пилота'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="антураж"><i>антура'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абордаж"><i>аборда'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пассаж"><i>пасса'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вояж"><i>воя'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="саквояж"><i>саквоя'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="репортаж"><i>репорта'ж</i><par n="пейзаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="багаж"><i>бага'ж</i><par n="багаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="этаж"><i>эта'ж</i><par n="багаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бич"><i>би'ч</i><par n="багаж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="борщ"><i>бо'рщ</i><par n="багаж__n"/></e>
